Illinois, session 104th, SB1974.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Telehealth Act is amended by adding Section 520 as follows: 6    (225 ILCS 150/20 new)7    Sec. 20. Facility fees for telehealth services.8    (a) As used in this Section, "facility fee" means any 9charge, cost, or fee imposed by a health care provider or 10health care facility in connection with the provision of 11telehealth services, excluding fees for the actual delivery of 12health care services.13    (b) No health care provider, health care facility, or 14associated entity shall impose or collect a facility fee in 15connection with any telehealth services provided to patients 16in the State of Illinois.17    (c) The prohibition in subsection (b) does not apply to 18any fees that are directly related to in-person services that 19may be required to supplement telehealth care if such fees are 20itemized and clearly communicated to the patient before the 21in-person services are provided.